Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5350.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9209. (1) Before November 1 of each year, the principal or administrator of each school shall deliver to the state department and local health departments a list of the immunization status at the time of school entry of new entering kindergarten and first grade students. (2) The department shall prescribe minimum percentage levels of immunization for children in a school. (3) As a result of the information collected pursuant to under subsection (1), the local health officer shall take do both of the following: (a) Take appropriate action, including immunization clinics, to raise the immunization level of children entering school to the levels established pursuant to under subsection (2). (b) By June 1, 2028, and by June 1 of each year thereafter, submit a written report to the local governing entity that includes all of the following information, deidentified and in the aggregate, as applicable: (i) The immunization level of children entering school. (ii) The percentage of children who are exempt from immunization under section 9215(1). (iii) The percentage of children who are exempt from immunization under section 9215(2). (iv) A list of each school in the area serviced by the local health department with a total percentage of children who are exempt from immunization under section 9215 that exceeds 5%, and a description of the action that the local health department plans to take during the next year to reduce the total percentage of children who are exempt from immunization under section 9215 to below 5%. (4) Before the following February 1, the principal or administrator of each school shall update the list described in subsection (1) to show the additional immunizations received by each child since entering the school. The reports shall must be made on forms provided or approved by the department. A child who enters school in September and who has not completed the immunizations required under section 9227 and has not filed an exemption under section 9215 before February 1 shall must be excluded from school attendance. A child who enters school at any other time of the school year and who has not completed the immunizations required under section 9227 and has not filed an exemption under section 9215 within 4 months after entrance shall must be excluded from school attendance. (5) As used in this section, "local governing entity" means that term as defined in section 2406.